Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-7114
Legislative findings.

(1) The Legislature finds that it is common for public safety personnel to experience stress and emotional difficulties as a result of traumatic events and common job stressors experienced on a regular basis. Peer support can be beneficial to public safety personnel and can reduce the likelihood that such individuals will experience long-term effects that may have a negative impact on their well-being.

(2) The Legislature further finds that confidentiality is a necessary foundation of effective peer support. The privileged and confidential nature of a peer support session ensures confidentiality and encourages an individual to speak openly to a peer without fear that a communication could be used against the individual in a disciplinary or other hearing.

Laws 2026, LB816, § 1.
July 18, 2026